Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.20.476

Sea grant program—Geoduck aquaculture research account.

The geoduck aquaculture research account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from any legislative appropriations, the aquaculture industry, or any other private or public source directed to the account must be deposited in the account. Expenditures from the account may only be used by the sea grant program for the geoduck research projects identified by RCW 28B.20.475. Only the president of the University of Washington or the president's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to the allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures. During the 2017-2019, 2019-2021, and 2021-2023 fiscal biennia, amounts available in the geoduck aquaculture research account may also be appropriated for the sea grant program at the University of Washington to conduct research examining the possible negative and positive effects of evolving shellfish aquaculture techniques and practices on Washington's economy and marine ecosystems. It is the intent of the legislature that this policy be continued in future biennia.

[ 2021 c 334 s 961; 2019 c 415 s 953; 2018 c 299 s 905; 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 960; 2007 c 216 s 2.]

NOTES:

Conflict with federal requirements—Effective date—2021 c 334: See notes following RCW 43.79.555.

Effective date—2019 c 415: "Except for section 989 of this act, this act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [May 21, 2019]." [ 2019 c 415 s 1803.]

Effective date—2018 c 299: See note following RCW 43.41.433.

Effective dates—2013 2nd sp.s. c 4: See note following RCW 2.68.020.